District of Columbia statutes.
38-160

Public schools Schedule A submission.

The District of Columbia Public Schools shall submit to the Board of Education by January 1st and July 1st of each year a Schedule A showing all the current funded positions of the District of Columbia Public Schools, their compensation levels, and indicating whether the positions are encumbered. The Board of Education shall approve or disapprove each Schedule A within 30 days of its submission and provide the Council of the District of Columbia a copy of the Schedule A within 5 days of its approval.

History

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 362, 50 DCR 5668

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 362 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle G of title III of Law 15-39: Section 361 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that subtitle G of title III of the act may be cited as the Public Schools Schedule A Submission Act of 2003.